Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) A "system of sewerage" means and may include any or all of the following:

(a) Sanitary sewage collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and services, including without limitation on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, large on-site sewage systems defined under RCW 70A.115.010, inspection services and maintenance services for private or public on-site systems, or any other means of sewage treatment and disposal approved by the county;

(b) Combined sanitary sewage disposal and storm or surface water drains and facilities;

(c) Storm or surface water drains, channels, and facilities;

(d) Outfalls for storm drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and facilities for storm drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and rights and interests in property relating to the system;

(e) Combined water and sewerage systems;

(f) Point and nonpoint water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage facilities and programs operated by a county;

(g) Public restroom and sanitary facilities;

(h) The facilities and services authorized in RCW 36.94.020; and

(i) Any combination of or part of any or all of such facilities.

(2) A "system of water" means and includes:

(a) A water distribution system, including dams, reservoirs, aqueducts, plants, pumping stations, transmission and lateral distribution lines and other facilities for distribution of water;

(b) A combined water and sewerage system;

(c) Any combination of or any part of any or all of such facilities.

(3) A "sewerage and/or water general plan" means a general plan for a system of sewerage and/or water for the county which shall be an element of the comprehensive plan established by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70.350(6) and/or chapter 35.63 RCW, if there is such a comprehensive plan.

(a) A sewerage general plan shall include the general location and description of treatment and disposal facilities, trunk and interceptor sewers, pumping stations, monitoring and control facilities, channels, local service areas and a general description of the collection system to serve those areas, a description of on-site sanitary sewerage system inspection services and maintenance services, and other facilities and services as may be required to provide a functional and implementable plan, including preliminary engineering to assure feasibility. The plan may also include a description of the regulations deemed appropriate to carrying out surface drainage plans.

(b) A water general plan shall include the general location and description of water resources to be utilized, wells, treatment facilities, transmission lines, storage reservoirs, pumping stations, and monitoring and control facilities as may be required to provide a functional and implementable plan.

(c) Water and/or sewerage general plans shall include preliminary engineering in adequate detail to assure technical feasibility and, to the extent then known, shall further discuss the methods of distributing the cost and expense of the system and shall indicate the economic feasibility of plan implementation. The plans may also specify local or lateral facilities and services. The sewerage and/or water general plan does not mean the final engineering construction or financing plans for the system.

(4) "Municipal corporation" means and includes any city, town, metropolitan municipal corporation, any public utility district which operates and maintains a sewer or water system, any sewer, water, diking, or drainage district, any diking, drainage, and sewerage improvement district, and any irrigation district.

(5) A "private utility" means and includes all utilities, both public and private, which provide sewerage and/or water service and which are not municipal corporations within the definition of this chapter. The ownership of a private utility may be in a corporation, nonprofit or for profit, in a cooperative association, in a mutual organization, or in individuals.

(6) "Board" means one or more boards of county commissioners and/or the legislative authority of a home rule charter county.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1029; 2007 c 343 s 14; 1997 c 447 s 10; 1981 c 313 s 14; 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 1; 1967 c 72 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1997 c 447: See note following RCW 70.05.074.

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.

Construction—1971 ex.s. c 96: "This 1971 amendatory act shall apply to any existing and future sewerage and/or water plans or amendments thereto and implementations thereof and shall not be deemed to be prospective only." [ 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 12.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 13.]